Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3606
Benefits to policyholders; loss-ratio standards.

Medicare supplement policies shall return to policyholders benefits which are reasonable in relation to the premium charged. The director shall adopt and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations to establish minimum standards for loss ratios of medicare supplement policies on the basis of incurred claims experience, or incurred health care expenses when coverage is provided by a health maintenance organization on a service basis rather than a reimbursement basis, and earned premiums in accordance with accepted actuarial principles and practices.

Laws 1980, LB 877, § 6;

Laws 1981, LB 329, § 6;

Laws 1988, LB 998, § 7;

Laws 1990, LB 983, § 5;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 23.